North Dakota statutes. TITLE 15 Education
CHAPTER 15-39.1 Teachers’ Fund for Retirement
15-39.1-26.
Investment of moneys in fund — Interest and earnings attributable to fund.

Investment of the fund is under the supervision of the state investment board in accordance with chapter 21-10. The moneys must be placed for investment only with a firm or firms whose endeavor is money management, and only after a trust agreement or contract has been executed. Investment costs may be paid directly from the fund, and are hereby appropriated for that purpose, in accordance with section 21-10-06.2. All interest and earnings on funds administered by the board must be credited to the fund.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 184, § 1; 1983, ch. 219, § 1; 1985, ch. 223, § 1; 1987, ch. 190, § 3; 1989, ch. 667, § 3; 1999, ch. 37, § 24.

15-39.1-27.
Computation of years of service.

In computing the terms of service of a member under this chapter, for a member employed full time, a year is deemed to be one hundred seventy-five days of compensation. Employment less than one hundred seventy-five days of compensation is not deemed to be a full year but only as the proportion of a year as the number of hours employed in each year of service bears to seven hundred hours.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 184, § 1; 1981, ch. 196, § 1; 1983, ch. 216, § 5; 1987, ch. 220, § 5.

15-39.1-28.
Tax levy for teachers’ retirement.

Any school district by a resolution of its school board may use the proceeds of levies, as permitted by section 57-15-14.2, for the purposes of meeting the district’s contribution to the fund arising under this chapter and to provide the district’s share, if any, of contribution to the fund for contracted employees of either a multidistrict special education board or another school district where the contracted employees are also providing services to the taxing school district.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 184, § 1; 1975, ch. 152, § 1; 1979, ch. 238, § 1; 1981, ch. 197, § 1; 1983, ch. 593, § 10; 1983, ch. 606, § 23; 1983, ch. 608, § 4; 2013, ch. 13, § 21; 2015, ch. 137, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 1 of chapter 137, S.L. 2015 became effective July 1, 2015.

Note.

The 2015 amendment to this section by section 1, of chapter 137, S.L. 2015, was to remove the expiration date of the section.

15-39.1-29.
Fraud against fund — Penalty.

Any person who knowingly makes a false statement, or falsifies or permits to be falsified any record or records of this retirement fund in any attempt to defraud such fund as a result of such act, is guilty of theft, and is punishable therefor under the laws of the state of North Dakota. Should any change or error in records result in any person receiving from the fund more or less than that person would have been entitled to receive had the records been correct, then, on the discovery of any such error, the board shall correct such error, and, as far as practicable, shall adjust the payments in such a manner that the actuarial equivalent of the benefit to which such person was correctly entitled is paid.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 233, § 1.

15-39.1-30.
Confidentiality of records.

All records relating to the retirement benefits of a member or a beneficiary under this chapter are confidential and are not public records. The information and records may be disclosed, under rules adopted by the board, only to:

A person to whom the teacher has given written consent to have the information disclosed.

A person legally representing the teacher, upon proper proof of representation, and unless the teacher specifically withholds consent.

A person authorized by a court order.

A member’s participating employer, limited to information concerning the member’s years of service credit, years of age, employer and employee contribution amounts, and salary. The board may share other types of information as needed by the employer to validate the employer’s compliance with existing state or federal law. Any information provided to the member’s participating employer under this subsection must remain confidential except as provided in subsection 6.

The administrative staff of the public employees retirement system for purposes relating to membership and benefits determination.

State or federal agencies for the purpose of validating member eligibility or employer compliance with existing state or federal law.

Member interest groups approved by the board, limited to information concerning the member’s death.

A government child support enforcement agency for purposes of establishing paternity or establishing, modifying, or enforcing a child support obligation of the member.

The member’s spouse or former spouse, that individual’s legal representative, and the judge presiding over the member’s dissolution proceeding for purposes of aiding the parties in drafting a qualified domestic relations order under section 15-39.1-12.2. The information disclosed under this subsection must be limited to information necessary for drafting the order.

Beneficiaries designated by a participating member or a former participating member to receive benefits after the member’s death, but only after the member’s death. Information relating to beneficiaries may be disclosed to other beneficiaries of the same member.

The general public, but only after the board has been unable to locate the member for a period in excess of two years, and limited to the member’s name and the fact that the board has been unable to locate the member.

Any person if the board determines disclosure is necessary for treatment, operational, or payment purposes, including the completion of necessary documents.

A person if the information relates to an employer service purchase, but the information must be limited to the member’s name and employer, the retirement program in which the member participates, the amount of service credit purchased by the employer, and the total amount expended by the employer for that service credit purchase. Information identified under this subsection may only be obtained from the member’s employer.

Source:

S.L. 1987, ch. 224, § 1; 2001, ch. 169, § 5; 2005, ch. 415, § 7; 2009, ch. 162, § 6.

15-39.1-31.
Correction of errors — Adjustment to actuarial equivalent.

If any change or error in the records of the fund or any participating employer or error in any calculation results in any person receiving from the fund more than that person would have been entitled to receive had the records been correct, the board shall correct the error and, as far as practicable, adjust the payment in such a manner that the actuarial equivalent of the benefit to which the person was entitled is paid or the board may offset the amount of the overpayment from the amount of future retirement benefit payments. However, if the person agrees to repay the fund for the cost of the error upon terms acceptable to the board, no actuarial adjustment to the person’s retirement benefit need be made.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 169, § 9.

15-39.1-32.
Correction of errors — Lump sum payment.

If any change or error in the records of the fund or any participating employer or any error in calculation results in any person receiving less from the fund than that person would have been entitled to receive had the records been correct, the board shall correct the error and adjust the payment in such a manner that the benefit to which the person was correctly entitled is paid. In addition, the board shall remit payment to the person in a lump sum to compensate that person for the difference between what was paid and what should have been paid. No interest may be assessed against the fund for providing payment for the correction of any loss of benefits.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 169, § 9.

15-39.1-33.
Employer service purchases.

A participating employer may purchase additional service credit on behalf of a member under the following conditions:

The member may not be given the option to choose between an employer service purchase and an equivalent amount paid in cash.

The member must meet one of the following conditions at the time the purchase is made:

The tier one member’s age plus service credit must be equal to or greater than seventy-seven;

The tier one member’s age must be at least fifty-five and the member must have at least three years of service credit;

The tier two member’s age plus service credit must be equal to or greater than eighty-two; or

The tier two member’s age must be at least fifty-five and the member must have at least five years of service credit.

The board must determine the purchase price on an actuarially equivalent basis.

The purchase must be completed before the member’s retirement.

The employer may purchase a maximum of three years of service credit on behalf of the member.

The employer must pay the purchase price for the service credit purchased under this section in a lump sum.

Source:

S.L. 2003, ch. 140, § 10; 2007, ch. 157, § 13.

Note.

Section 14 of chapter ch. 157, S.L. 2007 provides: “

APPLICATION.

Sections 1, 6, 10, 11, 12, and 15 of this Act apply to salaries earned on and after July 1, 2007, and sections 2, 3, 4, 5, 7, 8, 9, and 13 [which amends this section] apply to salaries earned on and after July 1, 2008.”

15-39.1-34.
Internal Revenue Code compliance.

The board shall administer the plan in compliance with section 415, section 401(a)(9), section 401(a)(17), and section 401(a)(31) of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended, and regulations adopted pursuant to those provisions as they apply to governmental plans.

Pursuant to the rollover rules under section 401(a)(31) of the Internal Revenue Code, a distributee may elect to have an eligible rollover distribution, as defined in section 402(f)(2)(A) of the Internal Revenue Code, paid in a direct rollover to an eligible retirement plan, as defined in section 402(c)(8)(B) of the Internal Revenue Code, specified by the distributee.

The definition of eligible retirement plan also applies in the case of a distribution to an alternate payee under a qualified domestic relations order, as defined in section 414(p) of the Internal Revenue Code.

Any portion of a distribution that consists of after-tax employee contributions not included in gross income may not be transferred except to an individual retirement account or individual retirement annuity described in section 408 or 408 A of the Internal Revenue Code or to a qualified plan or an annuity contract described in sections 401(a) and 403(b) of the Internal Revenue Code, respectively, which agrees to separately account for such amounts, including separately accounting for the portion of the distribution which is included in gross income and the portion of the distribution which is not so included.

For purposes of this section, “distributee” includes a nonspouse beneficiary of a deceased member; except in the case of a nonspouse beneficiary, the direct rollover may be made only to an individual retirement account or individual retirement annuity described in section 408 or 408 A of the Internal Revenue Code which is established on behalf of the nonspouse beneficiary and will be treated as an inherited individual retirement account or inherited individual retirement annuity pursuant to section 402(c) (11) of the Internal Revenue Code.

Source:

S.L. 2005, ch. 147, § 6; 2015, ch. 136, § 7, effective August 1, 2015; 2019, ch. 142, § 1, effective August 1, 2019.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 7 of chapter 136, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

15-39.1-35.
Savings clause — Plan modifications.

If the board determines that any section of this chapter does not comply with applicable federal statutes or rules, the board shall adopt appropriate terminology with respect to that section as will comply with those federal statutes or rules, subject to the approval of the employee benefits programs committee. Any plan modifications made by the board pursuant to this section are effective until the effective date of any measure enacted by the legislative assembly providing the necessary amendments to this chapter to ensure compliance with the federal statutes or rules.

Source:

S.L. 2013, ch. 141, § 5.